Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.100

Office of student financial assistance and program administrator—Joint duties.

The office and the program administrator shall jointly:

(1) Determine criteria for qualifying undergraduate programs, majors, and courses leading to a bachelor's degree in mathematics, science, or a related field, offered by institutions of higher education. The office shall publish the criteria for qualified courses, and lists of qualified programs and qualified majors, on its website on a biennial basis; and

(2) Establish criteria for selecting among eligible applicants those who, without scholarship assistance, would be least likely to pursue a qualified undergraduate program at an institution of higher education in Washington state.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 187; 2007 c 214 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.